Washington statutes.
RCW 36.58.150

Solid waste disposal district—Excess levies authorized—General obligation and revenue bonds.

(1) A solid waste disposal district shall not have the power to levy an annual levy without voter approval, but it shall have the power to levy a tax, in excess of the one percent limitation, upon the property within the district for a one year period to be used for operating or capital purposes whenever authorized by the electors of the district pursuant to RCW 84.52.052 and Article VII, section 2(a) of the state Constitution.

A solid waste disposal district may issue general obligation bonds for capital purposes only, subject to the limitations prescribed in RCW 39.36.020(1), and may provide for the retirement of the bonds by voter-approved bond retirement tax levies pursuant to Article VII, section 2(b) of the state Constitution and RCW 84.52.056. Such general obligation bonds shall be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

A solid waste disposal district may issue revenue bonds to fund its activities. Such revenue bonds may be in any form, including bearer bonds or registered bonds as provided in RCW 39.46.030.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, such revenue bonds may be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 1984 c 186 s 25; 1983 c 167 s 71; 1982 c 175 s 6.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.

Severability—1982 c 175: See note following RCW 36.58.100.